third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
FLAG num
SFX 155 N 17
SFX 155 0 вӣ .
SFX 155 0 виам .
SFX 155 0 виамон .
SFX 155 0 виамонро .
SFX 155 0 вианд .
SFX 155 0 виатон .
SFX 155 0 виаш .
SFX 155 0 виашон .
SFX 155 0 виашро .
SFX 155 0 виву .
SFX 155 0 вии .
SFX 155 0 виро .
SFX 155 0 вист .
SFX 155 0 вию .
SFX 155 0 вият .
SFX 155 0 вияти .
SFX 155 0 вияш .

SFX 156 N 8
SFX 156 0 ванд .
SFX 156 0 вандам .
SFX 156 0 вандамон .
SFX 156 0 ванданд .
SFX 156 0 вандаш .
SFX 156 0 ванди .
SFX 156 0 вандро .
SFX 156 0 ванду .

SFX 157 N 9
SFX 157 0 вандӣ .
SFX 157 0 вандиаш .
SFX 157 0 вандиашонро .
SFX 157 0 вандиву .
SFX 157 0 вандии .
SFX 157 0 вандиро .
SFX 157 0 вандист .
SFX 157 0 вандисту .
SFX 157 0 вандию .

SFX 158 N 3
SFX 158 0 ванде .
SFX 158 0 вандеро .
SFX 158 0 вандест .

SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 0 вандие .

SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 0 вандо .

SFX 161 N 8
SFX 161 0 вандон .
SFX 161 0 вандонамон .
SFX 161 0 вандонат .
SFX 161 0 вандонаш .
SFX 161 0 вандонашон .
SFX 161 0 вандони .
SFX 161 0 вандонро .
SFX 161 0 вандону .

SFX 162 N 2
SFX 162 0 вандоне .
SFX 162 0 вандонеро .

SFX 163 N 13
SFX 163 0 вар .
SFX 163 0 варам .
SFX 163 0 варамон .
SFX 163 0 варамро .
SFX 163 0 варанд .
SFX 163 0 варат .
SFX 163 0 вараш .
SFX 163 0 варашон .
SFX 163 0 варашро .
SFX 163 0 варем .
SFX 163 0 вари .
SFX 163 0 варро .
SFX 163 0 вару .

SFX 164 N 2
SFX 164 0 варҳо .
SFX 164 0 варҳояш .

SFX 165 N 9
SFX 165 0 варӣ .
SFX 165 0 вариат .
SFX 165 0 вариаш .
SFX 165 0 вариашро .
SFX 165 0 вариву .
SFX 165 0 варии .
SFX 165 0 вариро .
SFX 165 0 варист .
SFX 165 0 варию .

SFX 166 N 3
SFX 166 0 варе .
SFX 166 0 вареро .
SFX 166 0 варест .

SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 0 вариҳо .

SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 0 варо .

SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 0 варова .

SFX 170 N 10
SFX 170 0 варон .
SFX 170 0 варонамон .
SFX 170 0 варонанд .
SFX 170 0 варонат .
SFX 170 0 варонаш .
SFX 170 0 варонашон .
SFX 170 0 варонем .
SFX 170 0 варони .
SFX 170 0 варонро .
SFX 170 0 варону .

SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 0 варона .

SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 0 вароне .

SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 0 вартар .

SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 0 вархон .

SFX 175 N 8
SFX 175 0 ваш .
SFX 175 0 вашам .
SFX 175 0 вашанд .
SFX 175 0 вашат .
SFX 175 0 вашаш .
SFX 175 0 ваши .
SFX 175 0 вашро .
SFX 175 0 вашу .

SFX 176 N 2
SFX 176 0 ваше .
SFX 176 0 вашест .

SFX 177 N 3
SFX 177 0 вашон .
SFX 177 0 вашони .
SFX 177 0 вашонро .

SFX 178 N 5
SFX 178 0 ввум .
SFX 178 0 ввумаш .
SFX 178 0 ввуми .
SFX 178 0 ввумро .
SFX 178 0 ввуму .

SFX 179 N 2
SFX 179 0 ввумӣ .
SFX 179 0 ввумиро .

SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 0 ввумин .

SFX 181 N 3
SFX 181 0 виҳо .
SFX 181 0 виҳои .
SFX 181 0 виҳою .

SFX 182 N 2
SFX 182 0 вие .
SFX 182 0 виест .

SFX 183 N 2
SFX 183 0 виён .
SFX 183 0 виёни .

SFX 184 N 14
SFX 184 0 вода .
SFX 184 0 водаам .
SFX 184 0 водаамон .
SFX 184 0 водаамонро .
SFX 184 0 водаамро .
SFX 184 0 водаат .
SFX 184 0 водаатон .
SFX 184 0 водааш .
SFX 184 0 водаашон .
SFX 184 0 водаашонро .
SFX 184 0 водаашро .
SFX 184 0 водаву .
SFX 184 0 водаи .
SFX 184 0 водаро .

SFX 185 N 5
SFX 185 0 водаҳо .
SFX 185 0 водаҳои .
SFX 185 0 водаҳоро .
SFX 185 0 водаҳоямон .
SFX 185 0 водаҳояшон .

SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 0 водаҳое .

SFX 187 N 9
SFX 187 0 водагӣ .
SFX 187 0 водагиамон .
SFX 187 0 водагиатон .
SFX 187 0 водагиатонро .
SFX 187 0 водагиаш .
SFX 187 0 водагиашон .
SFX 187 0 водагии .
SFX 187 0 водагиро .
SFX 187 0 водагиям .

SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 0 водагонашон .

SFX 189 N 2
SFX 189 0 водае .
SFX 189 0 водаеро .

SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 0 вом .

SFX 192 N 2
SFX 192 0 вонӣ .
SFX 192 0 вонии .

SFX 193 N 3
SFX 193 0 вона .
SFX 193 0 вонаи .
SFX 193 0 вонаю .

SFX 195 N 18
SFX 195 0 вор .
SFX 195 0 ворам .
SFX 195 0 ворамон .
SFX 195 0 ворамонро .
SFX 195 0 ворамро .
SFX 195 0 вораму .
SFX 195 0 воранд .
SFX 195 0 ворат .
SFX 195 0 воратон .
SFX 195 0 вораш .
SFX 195 0 ворашон .
SFX 195 0 ворашонро .
SFX 195 0 ворашро .
SFX 195 0 ворем .
SFX 195 0 вори .
SFX 195 0 ворон .
SFX 195 0 ворро .
SFX 195 0 вору .

SFX 196 N 3
SFX 196 0 ворҳо .
SFX 196 0 ворҳои .
SFX 196 0 ворҳоро .

SFX 197 N 8
SFX 197 0 ворӣ .
SFX 197 0 вориву .
SFX 197 0 вории .
SFX 197 0 вориро .
SFX 197 0 ворист .
SFX 197 0 ворию .
SFX 197 0 вориямон .
SFX 197 0 ворияш .

SFX 198 N 4
SFX 198 0 вора .
SFX 198 0 вораву .
SFX 198 0 вораи .
SFX 198 0 вораро .

SFX 199 N 5
SFX 199 0 вораҳо .
SFX 199 0 вораҳову .
SFX 199 0 вораҳои .
SFX 199 0 вораҳоро .
SFX 199 0 вораҳояш .

SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 0 вораӣ .

SFX 201 N 2
SFX 201 0 воравӣ .
SFX 201 0 воравии .

SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 0 воравор .

SFX 203 N 2
SFX 203 0 ворае .
SFX 203 0 вораест .

SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 0 ворак .

SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 0 вордон .

SFX 206 N 3
SFX 206 0 воре .
SFX 206 0 вореро .
SFX 206 0 ворест .

SFX 207 N 7
SFX 207 0 вориҳо .
SFX 207 0 вориҳову .
SFX 207 0 вориҳои .
SFX 207 0 вориҳоро .
SFX 207 0 вориҳою .
SFX 207 0 вориҳоям .
SFX 207 0 вориҳояш .

SFX 208 N 2
SFX 208 0 вориҳое .
SFX 208 0 вориҳоеро .

SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 0 ворие .

SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 0 воро .

SFX 211 N 3
SFX 211 0 ворон .
SFX 211 0 воронанд .
SFX 211 0 воронро .

SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 0 ворона .

SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 0 вороне .

SFX 214 N 3
SFX 214 0 вортар .
SFX 214 0 вортаранд .
SFX 214 0 вортару .

SFX 215 N 5
SFX 215 0 вот .
SFX 215 0 воташонро .
SFX 215 0 воти .
SFX 215 0 вотро .
SFX 215 0 воту .

SFX 216 N 4
SFX 216 0 вотҳо .
SFX 216 0 вотҳои .
SFX 216 0 вотҳоро .
SFX 216 0 вотҳоянд .

SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 0 вотӣ .

SFX 218 N 2
SFX 218 0 воте .
SFX 218 0 вотест .

SFX 219 N 6
SFX 219 0 вум .
SFX 219 0 вумаш .
SFX 219 0 вумашро .
SFX 219 0 вуми .
SFX 219 0 вумро .
SFX 219 0 вуму .

SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 0 вумиро .

SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 0 вумиҳо .

SFX 222 N 2
SFX 222 0 вумин .
SFX 222 0 вумини .

SFX 223 N 28
SFX 223 0 гӣ .
SFX 223 0 гиам .
SFX 223 0 гиамон .
SFX 223 0 гиамонро .
SFX 223 0 гиамро .
SFX 223 0 гианд .
SFX 223 0 гиат .
SFX 223 0 гиатон .
SFX 223 0 гиатонро .
SFX 223 0 гиатро .
SFX 223 0 гиаш .
SFX 223 0 гиашон .
SFX 223 0 гиашонро .
SFX 223 0 гиашро .
SFX 223 0 гиву .
SFX 223 0 гии .
SFX 223 0 гиро .
SFX 223 0 гист .
SFX 223 0 гию .
SFX 223 0 гиям .
SFX 223 0 гиямро .
SFX 223 0 гиянд .
SFX 223 0 гият .
SFX 223 0 гиятро .
SFX 223 0 гияш .
SFX 223 0 гияшон .
SFX 223 0 гияшро .
SFX 223 0 гияшу .

SFX 224 N 9
SFX 224 0 гаҳ .
SFX 224 0 гаҳам .
SFX 224 0 гаҳаст .
SFX 224 0 гаҳат .
SFX 224 0 гаҳаш .
SFX 224 0 гаҳашро .
SFX 224 0 гаҳи .
SFX 224 0 гаҳро .
SFX 224 0 гаҳу .

SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 гаҳҳои .

SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 гаҳаки .

SFX 227 N 3
SFX 227 0 гаҳе .
SFX 227 0 гаҳеро .
SFX 227 0 гаҳест .

SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 гаҳон .

SFX 229 N 16
SFX 229 0 гар .
SFX 229 0 гарам .
SFX 229 0 гарамон .
SFX 229 0 гарамро .
SFX 229 0 гаранд .
SFX 229 0 гаранду .
SFX 229 0 гарат .
SFX 229 0 гаратон .
SFX 229 0 гараш .
SFX 229 0 гарашон .
SFX 229 0 гарашро .
SFX 229 0 гаред .
SFX 229 0 гарем .
SFX 229 0 гари .
SFX 229 0 гарро .
SFX 229 0 гару .

SFX 230 N 2
SFX 230 0 гарҳо .
SFX 230 0 гарҳои .

SFX 231 N 11
SFX 231 0 гарӣ .
SFX 231 0 гариаш .
SFX 231 0 гариашон .
SFX 231 0 гариву .
SFX 231 0 гарии .
SFX 231 0 гариро .
SFX 231 0 гарист .
SFX 231 0 гарию .
SFX 231 0 гариям .
SFX 231 0 гариятро .
SFX 231 0 гарияш .

SFX 232 N 3
SFX 232 0 гаре .
SFX 232 0 гареро .
SFX 232 0 гарест .

SFX 233 N 4
SFX 233 0 гариҳо .
SFX 233 0 гариҳои .
SFX 233 0 гариҳоро .
SFX 233 0 гариҳояш .

SFX 234 N 2
SFX 234 0 гарие .
SFX 234 0 гариест .

SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 гаро .

SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 гаров .

SFX 237 N 13
SFX 237 0 гарон .
SFX 237 0 гаронам .
SFX 237 0 гаронамон .
SFX 237 0 гаронамонро .
SFX 237 0 гаронанд .
SFX 237 0 гаронат .
SFX 237 0 гаронатон .
SFX 237 0 гаронаш .
SFX 237 0 гаронашон .
SFX 237 0 гаронашро .
SFX 237 0 гарони .
SFX 237 0 гаронро .
SFX 237 0 гарону .

SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 гаронӣ .

SFX 239 N 5
SFX 239 0 гарона .
SFX 239 0 гаронаашон .
SFX 239 0 гаронаашонро .
SFX 239 0 гаронаи .
SFX 239 0 гаронаро .

SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 гаронаест .

SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 гароне .

SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 гартар .

SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 гартарини .
