third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
ҷо/25,9,224,226,29,10,859,14,846,16,18,19,861,20,21,22,23,24
ангушт/25,35,64,2,3,857,5,7,8,193,859,855,552,31,627,720,14,15
баҳра/25,163,165,173,9,29,859,539,540,542
бузург/25,852,2,3,857,4,5,7,8,195,197,206,210,211,212,213,214,29,859,344,345,862,853,402,855,856,863,540,580,584,31,627,14,742,751,752,15
гӯш/25,852,64,65,68,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,27,195,196,198,199,202,203,204,29,859,855,853,627,31,14,15
ду/25,852,178,179,180,27,195,9,219,221,222,223,28,262,263,33,265,266,264,271,272,294,295,29,859,855,14,846,757,758,763,16,817,818,819,820,821,822,19,22,23,24
жӯпин/163,170,195,859,15
кад/184
камон/25,852,35,64,2,4,5,7,163,164,165,195,206,229,231,232,238,302,29,859,855,552,696,14,15,787
кимё/852,155,229,231,236
клиника/25,155,9,859
кор/25,852,35,1,64,2,3,857,4,104,5,6,7,8,163,166,224,229,230,231,232,234,237,241,254,255,256,257,258,29,10,11,862,853,366,369,382,402,855,453,454,863,539,540,541,546,549,569,31,628,655,703,580,14,722,15,859
майдасавдо/229,230
манзил/25,852,35,58,2,3,5,6,7,8,224,227,254,255,258,29,859,862,853,855,14,15
моҳ/25,43,58,35,64,2,5,7,175,195,198,200,201,29,859,552,555,580,627,628,696,14,15,787
навҳа/25,5,9,229,231,237,239,29,859,14
намуна/25,4,7,155,182,195,29,10,859,14
насиҳат/5,25,2,6,7,8,229,232,237,239,29,10,859,855,14,15
носазо/25,195,212,9,29,10,859,14
он/25,2,4,858,5,7,224,254,294,29,10,11,859,31,14,15
пеш/25,68,64,78,2,3,4,858,5,6,7,8,163,170,27,224,254,29,859,360,421,425,426,430,439,571,580,625,627,31,14,742,743,744,745,746,747,751,15
пешин/852,224,228,254,258,259,859,14,15
полон/852,7,229,234,237,14
пушт/25,64,2,3,857,5,7,8,140,142,27,192,198,203,859,348,349,350,351,354,402,855,853,571,14,15
равшан/33,852,64,2,857,4,5,7,229,231,237,239,240,241,29,859,344,862,853,402,409,855,453,580,31,14,742,751,752,759,15
сӯг/195,197,206,207,210,211,29,859,569,15
сабза/25,7,195,197,215,216,217,218,9,29,311,337,338,339,342,859,14,846,16
само/7,155,195,215,9,29,859,14,846
сар/25,852,64,65,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,140,142,163,164,165,166,168,169,170,172,174,197,224,225,254,29,11,859,862,404,855,853,571,582,583,31,627,14,15,789
сарисина/223
сафед/25,852,35,36,44,64,2,857,4,5,7,8,229,291,294,29,859,344,862,853,402,855,856,552,31,14,742,759,15,775,787,806
се/4,178,9,219,222,220,254,262,263,265,859,14,757,763,16,817,818,821,24,23
си/9,219,262,859,14,846,860,757,16,817,821,21,23
ситам/25,2,8,229,231,232,233,237,239,274,276,277,278,279,280,286,287,289,29,859,531,14,15
сияҳ/852,64,190,231,291,11,859,14,742,759,15,775
сухан/25,2,3,857,5,6,7,8,147,163,165,166,170,171,172,229,29,11,859,31,14,729,15
тавон/852,1,2,4,7,8,229,231,232,237,242,10,11,859,474,540,539,580,581,600,602,604,606,31,703,704,705,14,15
тасвир/25,852,2,7,229,235,29,859,402,855,853,862,569,699,707,14,15
тилло/25,852,195,197,207,9,248,29,311,859,862,853,402,855,863,856,14,846,16,822,21,23
тоат/94,5,7,8,165,224,254,29,859,584,14,15
тороҷ/25,7,229,231,239,859,15
умед/25,33,29,3,857,5,7,8,195,197,206,207,208,209,211,212,214,254,258,859,531,569,586,584,14,15
усто/25,211,9,223,29,311,313,314,859,560,14,16
фаронса/155,181,183,9,859,14
феҳрист/25,203,859,855,15
фоҷиа/25,147,150,155,9,254,29,859,569,577,14
фосиқ/4,195,29,344,853,855,31,627,752,15
фронса/155,181
хар/25,852,35,1,64,65,68,75,77,2,857,4,104,5,7,140,147,195,196,206,29,10,11,859,862,853,360,366,367,368,369,374,382,384,387,395,396,397,398,399,400,401,426,440,474,580,31,14,15
хона/25,852,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,140,143,184,185,186,187,188,189,195,9,223,224,244,246,254,302,303,304,305,29,859,552,14,722,846,787,789,796,16,826,18,23
худо/25,33,852,4,156,157,158,160,161,9,29,309,11,30,319,859,344,853,404,855,856,863,14,846,16,18,20,21,22,23,24
шаҳр/25,852,64,65,75,2,3,857,4,5,7,8,140,156,157,158,159,161,162,29,10,859,344,855,853,862,402,409,411,453,454,456,457,468,863,14,15,787
шер/25,852,64,2,7,140,175,177,27,195,229,29,859,862,552,586,597,584,31,627,678,696,14,722,15,777,781
шикоят/25,852,5,7,8,229,237,29,859,402,855,547,14,15,786
шино/163,165,166,167,170,229,29,859
шира/25,7,195,197,205,206,9,29,859,569,14
шоҳ/33,852,64,2,4,5,7,175,176,177,195,197,29,859,346,853,360,402,855,862,552,580,31,627,633,14,15
юз/197,206,859,31,14,15
